Utah statutes.
31A-21-302.   Premiums.

(1)  Subject to Section 31A-21-310 and Subsection 31A-21-106(1), the policy shall clearly state the amount of the total premium or shall explain in detail how it is calculated.  Any fee, charge, or other consideration that is not part of the premium shall be disclosed and explained in writing to the insured.  The disclosure and explanation shall be clearly stated either on the policy, or on the insurer's billing to the insured. The premium need not be contained in a certificate issued under a group policy.  This Subsection (1) does not preclude premium adjustments or changes upon the renewal or endorsement of an existing policy.  However, the renewal or endorsement notice shall contain or be accompanied by a statement of the renewal or endorsement premium or credit.

(2)  Except as provided in Chapter 23a, Insurance Marketing - Licensing Producers, Consultants, and Reinsurance Intermediaries, no person may charge or receive any consideration for the insurance policy which is not stated in Subsection (1).

(3)  No person may knowingly collect any excessive amount as a premium or any amount for insurance which is not in the course of processing.  Any amount unknowingly collected shall be returned immediately on learning of the mistake.  Prepayment of premiums pursuant to the policy is not an excessive collection.  Insurance is in the course of processing if an application has been made for it which is being considered by the insurer, even though it has not yet been accepted or rejected.

